Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-906
Clinical nurse specialist practice, defined.

The practice of a clinical nurse specialist includes health promotion, health supervision, illness prevention, and disease management, including assessing patients, synthesizing and analyzing data, and applying advanced nursing practice. A clinical nurse specialist conducts and applies research, advocates, serves as an agent of change, engages in systems management, and assesses and intervenes in complex health care problems within the selected clinical specialty.

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-17,120;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 258.